Utah statutes.
16-6a-613.   Delegates.

(1)  A nonprofit corporation may provide in its bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

(2)  The bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

(a)  the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates, including their selection and removal;

(b)  calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

(c)  carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

